en: Fish analogues, Plant-based fish, Plantbased fish, Vegan fish
da: Plantebaserede fisk, Veganske fisk
hr: Analozi ribe
nl: Plantaardige vissen
pl: Zastępniki ryb
sv: Växtbaserade fiskar, Veganska fiskar

en: Salmon analogues, Vegan salmon
da: Plantebaserede laks, Veganske laks
sv: Växtbaserade laxar, Veganska laxar

en: Tuna analogues, Vegan tuna
da: Plantebaserede tun, Veganske tun
sv: Växtbaserade tonfiskar, Veganska tonfiskar

en: Cheese substitutes, Non-dairy cheeses, Plant cheeses, Plant-based cheeses, Vegan cheeses
ar: جبن نباتي
da: Veganske oste
de: Milchfreie Käse, Pflanzliche Käse, Käseersatz, Vegane Käse, Vegane Käsealternative
eo: Veganaj fromaĝoj
es: Quesos vegetales, Queso vegano
fa: پنیر گیاهی
fi: Vegaanijuustot
fr: Substituts du fromage, Fromages végétaux, Fromage végétal
hr: Zamjene za sir
id: Keju vegan
it: Formaggi vegani, Formaggio vegetale
ja: ビーガン・チーズ
jv: Kèju vegan
ko: 식물성 치즈
nb: Vegansk ost
nl: Veganistische kazen, Kaasvervangers, Plantaardige kazen, Veganistische kaas
pl: Zastępniki sera
pt: Queijo vegano
ru: Веганский сыр
sv: Veganska ostar, Veganost
zh: 純素起司

en: Sliced cheese substitutes, Sliced plant-based cheeses
de: Vegane Genuss-Scheiben
fr: Substituts de fromage en tranche, Tranches végétales
hr: Narezane zamjene za sir
nl: Plantaardige plakken
pl: Zastępniki sera w plastrach

en: Shredded cheese substitutes, Shredded plant-based cheeses, Grated cheese substitutes
fr: Substituts du fromage râpé

en: Cubed cheese substitutes, Diced plant-based cheeses
da: Veganske ostetern
sv: Tärnade veganska ostar

en: Cheddar cheese substitutes, Non-dairy cheddars, Vegan cheddars
da: Veganske oste med cheddarsmag
fr: Substituts de fromage saveur cheddar
sv: Veganska ostar med smak av cheddar

en: Sliced cheddar cheese substitutes, Plant-based slices cheddar flavour
da: Veganske skiver med cheddarsmag
de: Vegane Genuss-Scheiben Cheddar Geschmack
fr: Tranches végétales saveur cheddar
nl: Plantaardige plakken met cheddar-smaak
sv: Veganska skivar med smak av cheddar

en: Shredded cheddar cheese substitutes
fr: Substituts du fromage râpé saveur cheddar

en: Emmentaler cheese substitutes, Non-dairy emmentaler cheeses, Vegan emmentaler cheeses, Plant-based emmentaler cheeses, Vegan Swiss cheeses
da: Veganske emmentaleroste, Veganske ost med emmentalersmag
fr: Substituts de fromage saveur emmental
sv: Veganska emmentalerostar, Veganska ostar med smak av emmentaler

en: Sliced emmentaler cheese substitutes, Plant-based slices with emmentaler flavour
da: Veganske skiver med emmentalersmag
de: Vegane Genuss-Scheiben Emmentaler Geschmack
fr: Tranches végétales saveur emmental
nl: Plantaardige plakken met emmentaler-smaak
sv: Veganska skivar med smak av emmentaler

en: Feta-style cheese substitutes, Non-dairy fetas, Vegan fetas, Salad cheese substitutes, Vegan salad cheeses
da: Veganske salatoste, Veganske ost med fetasmag
fr: Substituts de fromage saveur feta
sv: Veganska vitostar, Veganska ostar med smak av feta

en: Cubed feta-style cheese substitutes, Diced feta-style cheese substitutes
da: Veganske salatostetern, Veganske ostetern med fetasmag
sv: Tärnade veganska vitostar, Tärnade veganska ostar med smak av feta

en: Gouda cheese substitutes, Non-dairy gouda cheeses, Vegan gouda cheeses, Plant-based gouda cheeses
da: Veganske goudaoste, Veganske ost med goudasmag
fr: Substituts de fromage saveur gouda
sv: Veganska goudaostar, Veganska ostar med smak av gouda

en: Sliced gouda cheese substitutes, Plant-based slices with gouda flavour
da: Veganske skiver med goudasmag
de: Vegane Genuss-Scheiben Gouda Geschmack
fr: Tranches végétales saveur gouda
nl: Plantaardige plakken met gouda-smaak
sv: Veganska skivar med smak av gouda

en: Mozzarella cheese substitutes, Non-dairy mozzarella cheeses, Vegan mozzarella cheeses, Plant-based mozzarella cheeses
da: Veganske mozzarellaoste, Veganske ost med mozzarellasmag
fr: Substituts de fromage saveur mozzarella
sv: Veganska mozzarellaostar, Veganska ostar med smak av mozzarella

en: Parmesan-style cheese substitutes, Non-dairy parmesans, Vegan parmesans
da: Veganske oste med parmesansmag
fr: Substituts de fromage saveur parmesan
sv: Veganska ostar med smak av parmesan

en: Shredded parmesan-style cheese substitutes
fr: Substituts du fromage râpé saveur parmesan

en: Puffed pulse cakes, pulse cakes, cakes of pulses
de: hülsenfruchtwaffeln
es: tortitas de legumbres
fr: galettes de légumineuses soufflées
hr: Puffed pulse cakes
it: galetti di legumi
nl: peulvruchtenwafels